Utah statutes.
62A-11-320.5.   Review and adjustment of child support order in three-year cycle -- Substantial change in circumstances not required.

(1)  If a child support order has not been issued, modified, or reviewed within the previous three years, the office shall review a child support order, taking into account the best interests of the child involved, if:

(a)  requested by a parent or legal guardian involved in a case receiving IV-D services; or

(b)  there has been an assignment under Section 35A-3-108 and the office determines that a review is appropriate.

(2)  If the office conducts a review under Subsection (1), the office shall determine if there is a difference of 10% or more between the amount ordered and the amount that would be required under the child support guidelines.  If there is such a difference and the difference is not of a temporary nature, the office shall:

(a)  with respect to a child support order issued or modified by the office, adjust the amount to that which is provided for in the guidelines;  or

(b)  with respect to a child support order issued or modified by a court, file a petition with the court to adjust the amount to that which is provided for in the guidelines.

(3)  The office may use automated methods to:

(a)  collect information and conduct reviews under Subsection (2); and

(b)  identify child support orders in which there is a difference of 10% or more between the amount of child support ordered and the amount that would be required under the child support guidelines for review under Subsection (1)(b).

(4) (a)  A parent or legal guardian who requests a review under Subsection (1)(a) shall provide notice of the request to the other parent within five days and in accordance with Section 62A-11-304.4.

(b)  If the office conducts a review under Subsections (1)(b) and (3)(b), the office shall provide notice to the parties of:

(i)  a proposed adjustment under Subsection (2)(a); or

(ii)  a proposed petition to be filed in court under Subsection (2)(b).

(5) (a)  Within 30 days of notice being sent under Subsection (4)(a), a parent or legal guardian may respond to a request for review filed with the office.

(b)  Within 30 days of notice being sent under Subsection (4)(b), a parent or legal guardian may contest a proposed adjustment or petition by requesting a review under Subsection (1)(a) and providing documentation that refutes the adjustment or petition.

(6)  A showing of a substantial change in circumstances is not necessary for an adjustment under this section.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 232, 1997 General Session

